en: Garden Hoses
xx: Garden Hoses
cs: Zahradní hadice
da: Haveslanger
de: Gartenschläuche
es: Mangueras de jardín
fr: Tuyaux d'arrosage
it: Tubi da giardino
ja: 庭用ホース
nl: Tuinslangen
no: Hageslanger
pl: Węże ogrodowe
pt: Mangueiras de jardim
ru: Садовые шланги
sv: Vattenslangar
tr: Bahçe Hortumları

en: Sprinkler Accessories
xx: Sprinkler Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k postřikovačům
da: Sprinkler – tilbehør
de: Sprinklersysteme
es: Accesorios de aspersión
fr: Systèmes d'arrosage
it: Impianti irrigatori
ja: スプリンクラー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor beregeningssystemen
no: Vannspredertilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do zraszaczy
pt: Sistemas de sprinklers
ru: Принадлежности для водораспылителей
sv: Sprinklertillbehör
tr: Sprinkler Aksesuarları

en: Sprinkler Controls
xx: Sprinkler Controls
cs: Ovládání postřikovačů
da: Sprinkler – styresystemer
de: Steuerelemente für Sprinkleranlagen
es: Controles de aspersión
fr: Commandes d'arrosage
it: Controlli irrigatori
ja: スプリンクラー制御盤
nl: Beregeningsregeling
no: Vannsprederkontroller
pl: Sterowniki zraszaczy
pt: Controles de sprinklers
ru: Блоки управления водораспылителями
sv: Sprinklerreglage
tr: Sprinkler Kumandaları

en: Sprinkler Valves
xx: Sprinkler Valves
cs: Ventily postřikovačů
da: Sprinkler – ventiler
de: Sprinklerventile
es: Válvulas de aspersión
fr: Valves d'arrosage
it: Valvole irrigatori
ja: スプリンクラー用バルブ
nl: Beregeningskleppen
no: Vannsprederventiler
pl: Zawory zraszaczy
pt: Válvulas de sprinklers
ru: Краны распылителей
sv: Sprinklerventiler
tr: Sprinkler Vanaları

en: Sprinklers & Sprinkler Heads
xx: Sprinklers & Sprinkler Heads
cs: Zavlažovače a zavlažovací trysky
da: Sprinklere og sprinklerhoveder
de: Sprinkler & -köpfe
es: Aspersores y cabezales de aspersores
fr: Arroseurs et têtes d'arroseurs
it: Irrigatori e testine per irrigatori
ja: スプリンクラー・スプリンクラーヘッド
nl: Sproeiers en koppen voor beregeningssystemen
no: Vannspredere og sprederhoder
pl: Zraszacze i końcówki do zraszaczy
pt: Irrigadores\, aspersores e peças
ru: Водораспылители и головки
sv: Sprinklers och sprinklerhuvuden
tr: Bahçe Sulayıcılar ve Bahçe Sulayıcı Kafaları

en: Watering Can Accesssories
xx: Watering Can Accesssories
cs: Příslušenství k zalévacím konvím
da: Tilbehør til vandkander
de: Zubehör für Gießkannen
es: Accesorios para regaderas
fr: Accessoires pour arrosoirs
it: Accessori per annaffiatoi
ja: じょうろ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor gieters
no: Tilbehør til vannkanner
pl: Dodatki do konewek
pt: Acessórios para regadores
ru: Принадлежности для леек
sv: Vattenkannetillbehör
tr: Sulama Kovası Aksesuarları

en: Watering Cans
xx: Watering Cans
cs: Zalévací konve
da: Vandkander
de: Gießkannen
es: Regaderas
fr: Arrosoirs, Arrosoir
it: Annaffiatoi
ja: じょうろ
nl: Gieters
no: Vannkanner
pl: Konewki
pt: Regadores
ru: Лейки
sv: Vattenkannor
tr: Çiçek Sulama Kovaları

en: Watering Globes & Spikes
xx: Watering Globes & Spikes
cs: Zavlažovací koule a kolíky
da: Selvvandere
de: Wasserspender für Pflanzen
es: Globos y conos de autorriego
fr: Boules et cônes d'arrosage
it: Coni e palle per irrigazione
ja: 自動給水器
nl: Waterbollen en -spikes
no: Vanningskuler og ferievannere
pl: Kroplowniki
pt: Globos e bicos de irrigação
ru: Шарики для полива растений
sv: Bevattningskulor och -koner
tr: Sulama Aparatları

en: Lighting
xx: Lighting
cs: Osvětlení
da: Belysning
de: Beleuchtung
es: Iluminación
fr: Luminaires, Luminaire
it: Illuminazione
ja: 照明
nl: Verlichting
no: Belysning
pl: Oświetlenie
pt: Iluminação
ru: Осветительные приборы
sv: Belysning
tr: Aydınlatma

en: Emergency Lighting
xx: Emergency Lighting
cs: Nouzové osvětlení
da: Nødbelysning
de: Notbeleuchtung
es: Alumbrado de emergencia
fr: Éclairage de sécurité
it: Illuminazione d'emergenza
ja: 非常灯
nl: Noodverlichting
no: Nødbelysning
pl: Oświetlenie awaryjne
pt: Iluminação de emergência
ru: Аварийное освещение
sv: Nödbelysning
tr: Acil Durum Aydınlatması

en: Floating & Submersible Lights
xx: Floating & Submersible Lights
cs: Plovoucí osvětlení
da: Flydende lyskilder
de: Schwimmende Lichter
es: Luces flotantes
fr: Lampes flottantes
it: Luci galleggianti
ja: フローティング ライト
nl: Drijvende lichten
no: Flytelys
pl: Pływające oświetlenie
pt: Iluminação flutuante
ru: Плавучие светильники
sv: Flytande belysning
tr: Suda Yüzen Lambalar

en: Flood & Spot Lights
xx: Flood & Spot Lights
cs: Reflektory
da: Projektør- og spotbelysning
de: Flutlichter & Punktstrahler
es: Focos y reflectores
fr: Projecteurs
it: Luci per esterni ad alta intensità
ja: フラッドライト・スポットライト
nl: Schijnwerpers en spotlights
no: Flombelysning og lyskastere
pl: Reflektory
pt: Holofotes
ru: Прожекторы
sv: Strålkastare och spotlights
tr: Projektörler ve Spot Lambalar

en: In-Ground Lights
xx: In-Ground Lights
cs: Přízemní osvětlení
da: Havelamper til indbygning
de: Bodeneinbauleuchten
es: Luces empotrables de jardín
fr: Luminaires encastrés au sol
it: Luci da incasso al suolo
ja: 地中・水中埋込型照明
nl: Grondspots
no: Bakkebelysning
pl: Oświetlenie naziemne
pt: Iluminação posicionada no chão
ru: Напольные светильники
sv: Nedsänkta lampor
tr: Yer İçi Lambaları

en: Lamps
xx: Lamps
cs: Lampy
da: Lamper
de: Lampen
es: Lámparas móviles
fr: Lampes, Lampe, Halogène
it: Lampade
ja: スタンドライト
nl: Lampen
no: Lamper
pl: Lampy
pt: Luminárias
ru: Лампы
sv: Lampor
tr: Lambalar

en: Landscape Pathway Lighting
xx: Landscape Pathway Lighting
cs: Zahradní lampy
da: Havelamper
de: Wegbeleuchtung
es: Iluminación para senderos de jardín
fr: Éclairage d'allées
it: Luci decorative per vialetti
ja: 屋外通路用照明器具
nl: Tuinpadverlichting
no: Hagelamper
pl: Oświetlenie ścieżek ogrodowych
pt: Iluminação para caminho externo
ru: Освещение для садовых дорожек
sv: Gångbelysning
tr: Peyzaj Yol Aydınlatması

en: Light Bulbs
xx: Light Bulbs
cs: Žárovky a svítivky
da: Elpærer
de: Leuchtmittel
es: Bombillas
fr: Ampoules, Ampoule
it: Lampadine
ja: 電球
nl: Lichtbronnen
no: Lyspærer
pl: Żarówki
pt: Lâmpadas
ru: Лампочки
sv: Glödlampor
tr: Ampuller

en: Compact Fluorescent Lamps
xx: Compact Fluorescent Lamps
cs: Kompaktní zářivky
da: Elsparepærer
de: Kompaktleuchtstofflampen
es: Lámparas fluorescentes compactas
fr: Lampes fluorescentes compactes
it: Lampade fluorescenti compatte
ja: CFL
nl: Compacte fluorescentielampen
no: Sparepærer
pl: Świetlówki kompaktowe
pt: Lâmpadas fluorescentes compactas
ru: Компактные люминесцентные лампы
sv: Kompakta lysrör
tr: Kompakt Floresan Lambalar

en: Fluorescent Tubes
xx: Fluorescent Tubes
cs: Zářivky
da: Lysstofrør
de: Leuchtstoffröhren
es: Tubos fluorescentes
fr: Tubes fluorescents, Tube fluorescent, Néon
it: Tubi fluorescenti
ja: 蛍光灯
nl: Tl-buizen
no: Lysstoffrør
pl: Świetlówki
pt: Lâmpadas fluorescentes
ru: Люминесцентные трубки
sv: Lysrör
tr: Floresan Çubuklar

en: Incandescent Light Bulbs
xx: Incandescent Light Bulbs
cs: Žárovky
da: Glødepærer
de: Glühlampen
es: Bombillas incandescentes
fr: Ampoules incandescentes
it: Lampadine a incandescenza
ja: 白熱電球
nl: Gloeilampen
no: Glødelyspærer
pl: Żarówki tradycyjne
pt: Lâmpadas incandescentes
ru: Лампы накаливания
sv: Glödlampor med glödtråd
tr: Akkor Ampuller

en: LED Light Bulbs
xx: LED Light Bulbs
cs: LED svítivky
da: LED-pærer
de: LED-Leuchtmittel
es: Bombillas con diodos led
fr: Lampes à LED, LED
it: Lampadine LED
ja: LED電球
nl: LED-lampen
no: LED-lyspærer
pl: Żarówki diodowe
pt: Lâmpadas de LED
ru: Светодиодные лампы
sv: LED-glödlampor
tr: LED Ampuller